big.grammar.foma
read lexc big.ur.lexicon.lexc
define Lexicon;

source features.foma

define alph [a|b|d|d͡ʒ|e|f|h|i|j|k|l|m|n|o|p|r|s|t|t͡ʃ|u|v|w|z|ð|ŋ|ɔ|ə|ɛ|ɡ|ɣ|ɲ|ɾ|ʃ|ʎ|ʒ|β];

# Composite features
define +dor %-syl & [ %+hi | %+lo | %+back ];
define +pal %-syl & [ %-ant & %-cor & %+hi & %-lo & %-back ];
define +vel %-syl & [ %-ant & %-cor & %+hi & %-lo & %+back ]; # confirm this

define +plos [ %-son & %-cont & %-delrel ];
define +fric [ %-son & %+cont ];
define +approx [ %+son & %-nas ];
define -approx [ ~%+approx | ɾ ];

# Word final sonorant consonantal deletion, /n r/
# Only on stressed syllables, not following /r/
# Apparently not the same as rule in class, since environment for
# /r/ differs from /n/
# Still exceptions:
# 	- not monosyllabic?
# 	-
define TapDeletion ɾ -> 0 || _ .#.;
define NasalDeletion n -> 0 || 1[alph*][\r] _ .#.;

# [ %-approx & %-syl & %+cor & %+son ] -> 0
define SonCorDeletion TapDeletion .o. NasalDeletion;

# Tap becomes a trill before stops.
# Placing this after InterConFrication to avoid e.g.
# 	- ʃəm-1bɛɾɡ+Fem	ʃəm-1bɛr-ɣə
# but maybe sensitivity to syllable boundary would be more correct?
define PreStopTrill ɾ -> r || _%+plos;

# Sometimes word final rhotic tap becomes trill instead of being deleted
#	- whenever stressed except 'ðo_
# 
# Is it stress related?
#
# 	- pɾu-1li-ʒəɾ+Masc	pɾu-1li-ʒə
#	- pɾu-1li-fəɾ+Masc	pɾu-1li-fər
#
#	- lək-1ti-βuɾ+Masc	lək-1ti-βu
#	- um-1ni-βuɾ+Masc	um-1ni-βur
#
#	- u-1βi-βuɾ+Masc	u-1βi-βu
#	- u-1βi-pəɾ+Masc	u-1βi-pə
#	- u-1βi-ʒəɾ+Masc	u-1βi-ʒə
#	- u-1βi-fəɾ+Masc	u-1βi-fər
#
#	- dək-ti-1lɔp-təɾ+Masc	dək-ti-1lɔp-tər
#	- dək-ti-1li-fəɾ+Masc	dək-ti-1li-fə
#
#	- sum-1ni-fəɾ+Masc	sum-1ni-fər
#	- su-pu-1ɾi-fəɾ+Masc	su-pu-1ɾi-fər
define Trill ɾ -> r || 1[alph+] _ .#.;

# Monosyllables ending consonants get an -u
define MonosyllabicUEpen;

# Adjacent homorganic cons deletion
# -cont on righthand side to exclude [rn]
define HomCorDeletion [ %-syl & %+cor ] -> 0 || [ %-cont & %-syl & %+cor & %+son ] _ .#.;
define HomDorDeletion [ %-syl & %+dor ] -> 0 || [ %-cont & %-syl & %+dor & %+son ] _ .#.;
define HomDeletion HomCorDeletion .o. HomDorDeletion;

# Nasal place assimilation
# Yes but.. something more complicated going on
# e.g. forassenyat
# Also, by specifying -ant we're predicting h and t͡ʃ, but maybe that makes sense.

define AnteriorAssim n -> ɲ || _ [ %-ant ];
define VelarAssim n -> ŋ || _ [ %+vel ];
define NasalPlaceAssim VelarAssim .o. AnteriorAssim;

# Vocalic deletion: vowels followed by schwa are deleted, with a few exceptions.
define VocDeletion [ %+syl ] -> 0 || _ ə .#.;

define VocDeletionExceptions [
	[{nu} 	"+Fem" .x. {nuə}] |
	[{kru} 	"+Fem" .x. {kruə}]
];

# Stressed word final lenition of [ ɛ | b ] -> uw
# Has to precede WordFinPlosiveDevoicing
define WordFinStressedLenition b -> uw || 1[alph*] _ .#.;

# Needs to go before SonCorDeletion to avoid e.g.
#	- mi-u-1sɛn+Masc	mi-u-1sɛuw
define WordFinStressedLengthening ɛ -> ɛuw || 1[alph*] _ .#.;

# Word final plosive devoicing
define WordFinPlosiveDevoicing  ɡ -> k,
 								d -> t,
 								b -> p,
 								z -> s || _ .#.;

# Word final affrication
# [+fric] -> [-cont, +delrel]
define WordFinAffrication ʒ -> t͡ʃ,
						  ð -> d͡ʒ || _ .#.;

# Voiced stops become (continuant) fricatives in between sonorant continuants
# [ %+plos & %+voi ] -> [ %+cont ] || [ %+son & %+cont ] _ [ %+son & %+cont ]
define InterConFrication ɡ -> ɣ,
						 d -> ð,
						 b -> β || [ %+son & %+cont ] _ [ %+son & %+cont ];

# ɔ -> o when stressed
define StressedVowelClosing ɔ -> o || 1[alph*] _;

# primitive re-syllabification of word ending with attached schwa
# or schwa may become syllable of its own when it follows a vowel
define Syllabify0 [ %-syl ] -> %- ... || [ %+son | %+cont ] _ ə .#.;
define Syllabify1 ə -> %- ... || [ %+syl & \ə ] _ .#.;
define Syllabify Syllabify0 .o. Syllabify1;

# Surely there will be more.
define Exceptions VocDeletionExceptions;

# SYLLABIFICATION

# STRESS ASSIGNMENT

# VOWEL REDUCTION

# GEMINATION

define Grammar Lexicon
	.o. NasalPlaceAssim
	.o. WordFinStressedLengthening
	.o. SonCorDeletion
#	.o. Trill
#	.o. Flap
	.o. HomDeletion
	.o. WordFinStressedLenition
 	.o. WordFinPlosiveDevoicing
 	.o. WordFinAffrication
 	.o. InterConFrication
 	.o. PreStopTrill
# 	.o. StressedVowelClosing
	.o. Syllabify
	.o. VocDeletion;

define Grammar [Exceptions .P. Grammar];
